Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3280
State funds; allocated or disbursed; when.

No state funds shall be allocated or disbursed to a district unless that district has submitted its master plan in accordance with sections 2-3229 and 2-3276 and until the disbursing agency has determined that such funds are for plans, facilities, works, and programs which are in conformance with the plans of the agency.

Laws 1978, LB 783, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 30.